Utah, session 2026, HB456.
Section 1. Section 4-14-112 is enacted to read:4-14-112. Prohibited application near schools.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Boundary of a school" means the boundary of:(i)the parcel of real property, whether fenced or unfenced, on which is located a public or private elementary school or a secondary school, including a public or private driveway, street, sidewalk or walkway, parking lot, or parking garage on the real property; or(ii)a parcel of real property that is owned or leased by a local education agency or private school on which instruction, an extracurricular activity, or training of a public or private elementary school or secondary school is conducted.(b)"Perfluoroalkyl substance" or "polyfluoroalkyl substance" means a class of fluorinated chemicals that contains at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.(2)(a)A person may not apply a pesticide listed in Subsection (2)(b) within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a school.(b)The 1,000-feet prohibition of this Subsection (2) applies to:(i)paraquat dichlorate;(ii)atrazine;(iii)dicamba;(iv)chlorpyrifos;(v)2,4-dichloroacetic acid;(vi)glyphosate;(vii)diquat dibromide;(viii)perfluoroalkyl substance; or(ix)polyfluoroalkyl substance.(3)(a)A person may apply a pesticide that is not prohibited by Subsection (2) to property that is within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a school only if the person posts signs notifying of the application of a pesticide on the property:(i)72 hours before the application of the pesticide; and(ii)for 72 hours after the application of the pesticide.(b)This Subsection (3) does not apply to the application of:(i)biopesticides;(ii)antimicrobials;(iii)microbicides; or(iv)virucides.(4)For the purposes of this section, a person shall measure distances from the point on the property boundary of a school closest to the property on which the pesticide is being applied to the area of the property on which the pesticide is being applied.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.